Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0208.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Michigan veterans coalition grant program act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Accredited veteran service officer" means an individual who has met the qualifications for accreditation under 38 USC 5904 and 38 CFR 14.629. (b) "Agency" means the Michigan veterans affairs agency. (c) "Allowable expenditures" means those expenditures determined by the agency to be necessary and proper to support veteran service operations in this state. (d) "Fund" means the Michigan veterans coalition fund created in the Michigan veterans coalition fund act. (e) "Grant program" means the Michigan veterans coalition grant program created in section 5. (f) "Organization" means a veteran service organization. (g) "Veteran service operations" means assistance and programming of any kind to meet the needs of veterans in this state. Veteran service operations includes, but is not limited to, providing assistance, programming, and services for the purpose of assisting veterans in this state and providing advice, advocacy, and assistance to veterans, servicemembers, dependents, or survivors by an accredited veteran service officer to obtain United States Department of Veterans Affairs health, financial, or memorial benefits for which they are eligible. Sec. 5. (1) The agency shall consult with the Michigan veterans coalition to create and operate a Michigan veterans coalition grant program that provides grants to organizations for allowable expenditures related to veteran service operations. The agency shall make grants from the fund, on appropriation, to each organization that enters into a grant agreement with the agency and meets the conditions described in subsection (2) for the sole use of supporting allowable expenditures made by the organization. (2) To be eligible to receive a grant under subsection (1), an organization must certify, in a form and manner prescribed by the agency, that the organization provides accredited veteran service officer hours in support of connecting veterans and their families to available federal benefits. Administrative support, as needed, may be approved by the agency in support of veteran service operations. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 207 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.